Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.730

Inspection or grading of commodities—Methods.

Inspection or grading of a lot, partial lot, or sample of a commodity tendered for inspection or grading under this chapter shall consist of taking and examining a representative sample thereof and making such tests as are necessary to determine its grade, condition, or other qualitative measurement. Commodities tendered for inspection must be offered and made accessible for sampling at inspection points during customary business hours.

(1) No inspector shall issue a certificate of grade, grading factors, condition, or other qualitative measurement for any commodity unless the inspection or grading thereof be based upon a correct and representative sample of the commodity and the inspection is made under conditions which permit the determination of its true grade or quality, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. No sample shall be deemed to be representative unless it is of the size and procured in accordance with the uniform methods prescribed by the department.

(2) An inspection may be made of a submitted sample of a commodity, provided that the certificate issued in such case clearly shows that the inspection or grading covers only the submitted sample of such commodity and not the lot from which it is purportedly drawn.

(3) When commodities are tendered for inspection in such a manner as to make the drawing of a representative sample impossible, a qualified inspection may be made. In such case, the certificate shall clearly show the condition preventing proper sampling such as heavily loaded car, truck, barge, or other container, or other condition.

[ 1989 c 354 s 48; 1963 c 124 s 40. Formerly RCW 22.09.400.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.